apertium-hbs.hbs.metadix
    <pardef n="velik__comp__sfx">
      <!-- Comparative --><!--Note: I've switched the definiteness marker here with <comp>, since definiteness is relevant only for positive, but I'm not sure if this is practical -->
      <!--Masculine-->
      <!--Singular-->
      <!--Animate-->
      <e><p><l>veći</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većeg</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većega</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većem</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većemu</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većem</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većemu</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većeg</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većega</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>veći</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većim</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Inanimate-->
      <e><p><l>veći</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većeg</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većega</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većem</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većemu</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većem</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većemu</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>veći</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>veći</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Plural-->
      <!--Animate-->
      <e><p><l>veći</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većih</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većim</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većima</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većim</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većima</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većim</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većima</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>veće</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>veći</l><r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

      <!--Inanimate-->
      <e><p><l>veći</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većih</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većima</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većima</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većim</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većima</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>veće</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>veći</l><r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

      <!--Feminine-->
      <!--Singular-->
      <e><p><l>veća</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>veće</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većoj</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većoj</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>veću</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>veća</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većom</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Plural-->
      <e><p><l>veće</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većih</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većim</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većima</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većim</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većima</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većim</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većima</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>veće</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>veće</l><r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Neuter-->
      <!--Singular-->
      <e><p><l>veće</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većeg</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većega</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većemu</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većem</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većemu</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većem</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>veće</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>veće</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>velikim</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Plural-->
      <e><p><l>veća</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većih</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većim</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većima</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većim</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većima</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>većim</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>većima</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>veća</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>veća</l><r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <!--Superlative--><!-- it's just "naj"+comparative-->
      <!--Absolute Superlative--><!-- "pre"+comparative, explained somewhere in this document-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="velik__ssup__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>velik<s n="adj"/><s n="ssup"/></r></p><par n="velik__pst__sfx"/></e>
<!--      <e><p><l>veliko</l><r>veliko<s n="adv"/><s n="ssup"/></r></p></e> removable-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="velik__sup__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>velik<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p><par n="velik__comp__sfx"/></e>
<!--      <e><p><l>veće</l><r>veliko<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e> removable-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="velik__comp__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>velik<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p><par n="velik__comp__sfx"/></e>
<!--      <e><p><l>veće</l><r>veliko<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e> removable-->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="velik__pst__adj">
      <e><p><l></l><r>velik<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r></p><par n="velik__pst__sfx"/></e>
<!--      <e><p><l>veliko</l><r>veliko<s n="adv"/></r></p></e> removable-->
    </pardef>

    <e lm="velik"><i/><par n="velik__pst__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="velik"><i/><par n="velik__comp__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="velik"><p><l>naj</l><r></r></p><par n="velik__sup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="velik"><p><l>pre</l><r></r></p><par n="velik__ssup__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="srednje velik"><i>srednje<b/></i><par n="velik__pst__adj"/></e>
